Washington statutes.
RCW 6.21.120

Sheriff's deed to real property sold.

In all cases where real estate has been, or may hereafter be sold by virtue of an execution or other process, it shall be the duty of the sheriff or other officer making such sale to execute and deliver to the purchaser, or other person entitled to the same, a deed of conveyance of the real estate so sold. The deeds shall be issued upon request immediately after the confirmation of sale by the court in those instances where redemption rights have been precluded pursuant to RCW 61.12.093 et seq., or immediately after the time for redemption from such sale has expired in those instances in which there are redemption rights, as provided in RCW 6.23.060. In case the term of office of the sheriff or other officer making such sale shall have expired before a sufficient deed has been executed, then the successor in office of such sheriff shall, within the time specified in this section, execute and deliver to the purchaser or other person entitled to the same a deed of the premises so sold, and such deeds shall be as valid and effectual to convey to the grantee the lands or premises so sold, as if the deed had been made by the sheriff or other officer who made the sale.

[ 1987 c 442 s 612; 1965 c 80 s 5; 1899 c 53 s 16; RRS s 603. Prior: 1897 c 50 s 16. Formerly RCW 6.24.220.]

NOTES:

Sheriff, successor to complete process: RCW 36.28.130.